West Virginia, session 2026, HB4052.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 14. miscellaneous rules. §17C-14-9b. HALO Act. (a) As used in this section, the term:(1) "First responder" includes a law enforcement officer as defined in §23-4-1f of this code, or a correctional probation officer and an emergency medical care provider.(2) "Harass" means to engage in a course of conduct directed at a first responder which causes substantial emotional distress in that first responder.(b)(1)  It is unlawful for a person, after receiving a warning not to approach from a first responder who is engaged in the lawful performance of a legal duty, to violate such warning and approach or remain within 14 feet of the first responder with the intent to:(A) Interrupt, disrupt, hinder, impede, or interfere with the first responder’s ability to perform such duty;(B) Threaten the first responder with physical harm; or (C) Harass the first responder by interfering with the first responder performing such duty.(2) A person who violates this subsection commits a misdemeanor of obstructing an officer, punishable as provided in §61-5-17 of this code.